Washington statutes.
RCW 33.08.060

Investigation—Fee.

Upon receipt of the articles of incorporation and bylaws, the director shall proceed to determine, from all sources of information and by such investigation as he or she may deem necessary, whether:

(1) The proposed articles and bylaws comply with all requirements of law;

(2) The incorporators and directors possess the qualifications required by this title;

(3) The incorporators have available for the operation of the business at the specified location sufficient cash assets;

(4) The general fitness of the persons named in the articles of incorporation are such as to command confidence and warrant belief that the business of the proposed association will be honestly and efficiently conducted in accordance with the intent and purposes of this title;

(5) The public convenience and advantage will be promoted by allowing such association to be incorporated and engage in business in the market area indicated; and

(6) The population and industry of the market area afford reasonable promise of adequate support for the proposed association.

For the purpose of this investigation and determination, the incorporators, when delivering the articles and bylaws to the director, shall pay to the director an investigation fee, the amount of which shall be established by rule of the director.

[ 1994 c 92 s 429; 1982 c 3 s 18; 1969 c 107 s 1; 1963 c 246 s 1; 1945 c 235 s 7; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-126. Prior: 1933 c 183 s 6; 1925 ex.s. c 144 s 2; 1919 c 169 s 2; 1913 c 110 s 3; 1890 p 56 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.